Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1220
Regional center or treatment facility; administrator; discharge of involuntary patient; notice.

When the administrator of any regional center or treatment facility for the treatment of dangerous sex offenders determines that any involuntary patient in such facility may be safely and properly discharged or placed on convalescent leave, the administrator of such regional center or treatment facility shall immediately notify the mental health board of the judicial district from which such patient was committed. In the case of a subject who is domiciled in Indian country and committed for treatment as provided in section 71-1226.01, such administrator shall immediately notify the tribal court from which such patient was committed.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 76;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 31.